District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.73

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed under this subchapter, no person may use the term “barber” or imply that he or she is licensed to engage in the practice of barbering in the District.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.73.